Utah statutes.
20A-3-412.   State and county officials to provide supplies -- Violation a misdemeanor.

(1)  All state and county officials charged with the duty of providing ballots, forms, envelopes, postage, or other supplies shall:

(a)  provide those supplies at the expense of the particular department or office charged with those duties; and

(b)  provide them as expeditiously as possible in order to carry out the intent and purpose of this chapter.

(2)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

